Massachusetts, session 194th, S1954.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5A of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following subsection:-
(e) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2027, an
individual who is a member of the Massachusetts National Guard may exclude one hundred
percent of the income received from any of the following sources to the extent such income is
included in the individual's federal adjusted gross income: (i) serving in a 32 U.S.C. duty status
such as members attending drills, annual training and military schools and members who are
serving in a 32 U.S.C. active guard reserve or active duty for operational support duty status; (ii)
employment as a 32 U.S.C. federal dual-status technician with the Massachusetts National
Guard; or (iii) serving in a state active-duty status.
of 1